District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.15

Accountability for safekeeping of prisoners.

The Superintendent of the Washington Asylum and Jail shall be accountable for the safekeeping of all prisoners legally committed thereto.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1379, ch. 854, § 1191
Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 1003, ch. 192
Mar. 16, 1926, 44 Stat. 209, ch. 58, § 6

Section References

This section is referenced in § 24-201.13.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-415.
1973 Ed., § 24-415.